Illinois, session 104th, SB2452.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Acupuncture Practice Act is amended by 5changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 2/10)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)8    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "Acupuncture" means evaluation or treatment that is 10effected by stimulating certain body points by the insertion 11of pre-sterilized, single-use, disposable needles, unless 12medically contraindicated. "Acupuncture" includes, but is not 13limited to, stimulation that may be effected by the 14application of heat, including far infrared, or cold, 15electricity, electro or magnetic stimulation, cold laser, 16vibration, cupping, gua sha, manual pressure, or other 17methods, with or without the concurrent use of needles, to 18prevent or modify the perception of pain, to normalize 19physiological functions, or for the treatment of diseases or 20dysfunctions of the body and includes the determination of a 21care regimen or treatment protocol according to traditional 22East Asian principles and activities referenced in Section 15 23of this Act for which a written referral is not required. In   SB2452- 2 -LRB104 09577 AAS 19640 b1accordance with this Section, the practice known as dry 2needling or intramuscular manual stimulation, or similar 3wording intended to describe such practice, is determined to 4be within the definition, scope, and practice of acupuncture. 5Acupuncture also includes evaluation or treatment in 6accordance with traditional and modern practices of East Asian 7medical theory, including, but not limited to, moxibustion, 8herbal medicinals, natural or dietary supplements, manual 9methods, exercise, and diet to prevent or modify the 10perception of pain, to normalize physiological functions, or 11for the treatment of diseases or dysfunctions of the body and 12includes activities referenced in Section 15 of this Act for 13which a written referral is not required. Acupuncture also 14includes ordering laboratory tests in accordance with State 15law to check, track, evaluate, and monitor the status and 16effectiveness of pain management, herbal medicinal plans, 17dietary and exercise plans, and orders as may be provided to 18the patient from a physician licensed under the Medical 19Practice Act. Acupuncture does not include radiology, 20electrosurgery, chiropractic technique, physical therapy, 21naprapathic technique, use or prescribing of any 22pharmaceuticals, or vaccines, or determination of a 23differential diagnosis. An acupuncturist licensed under this 24Act who is not also licensed as a physical therapist under the 25Illinois Physical Therapy Act shall not hold himself or 26herself out as being qualified to provide physical therapy or   SB2452- 3 -LRB104 09577 AAS 19640 b1physiotherapy services. 2    "Acupuncturist" means a person who practices acupuncture 3in all its forms, including traditional and modern practices 4in both teachings and delivery, and who is licensed by the 5Department. An acupuncturist shall refer to a licensed 6physician or dentist any patient whose condition should, at 7the time of evaluation or treatment, be determined to be 8beyond the scope of practice of the acupuncturist. 9    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 10by the Department in the applicant's or licensee's application 11file or license file as maintained by the Department's 12licensure maintenance unit. 13    "Board" means the Board of Acupuncture appointed by the 14Secretary.15    "Dentist" means a person licensed under the Illinois 16Dental Practice Act.17    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 18Professional Regulation.19    "Email address of record" means the designated email 20address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 21application file or the licensee's license file as maintained 22by the Department's licensure maintenance unit. 23    "Physician" means a person licensed under the Medical 24Practice Act of 1987.25    "Referral by written order" for purposes of this Act means 26a diagnosis, substantiated by signature of a physician or   SB2452- 4 -LRB104 09577 AAS 19640 b1dentist, identifying a patient's condition and recommending 2treatment by acupuncture as defined in this Act. The diagnosis 3shall remain in effect until changed by the physician or 4dentist who may, through express direction in the referral, 5maintain management of the patient.6    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 7Professional Regulation. 8    "State" includes:9        (1) the states of the United States of America;10        (2) the District of Columbia; and 11        (3) the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.12(Source: P.A. 100-375, eff. 8-25-17.)